New Jersey, session 222, A1800.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section, licensed premises shall include the premises where musical or theatrical performances or concerts are held and any adjacent premises owned and operated by the licensee. b.  It shall be lawful for the governing board or body of a municipality, upon the approval of the Director of the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control, to issue a plenary retail consumption license to a private theater entity that is incorporated on the effective date of this act, which regularly conducts a majority of live musical or theatrical performances or concerts for which admission is charged. c.  A license issued pursuant to this section shall be used in connection with a premises with a seating capacity of less than 400 persons and that is used primarily to conduct live musical or theatrical performances or concerts. The license shall a private entity, including a corporation, or its restaurant operator who has been approved pursuant to procedures established by the Division of Alcoholic Beverage Control to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the licensed premises. d.  A license issued under the provisions of this act shall not be counted in determining the number of licenses under P.L.1947, c.94 (C.33:1-12.13 et seq.) or under P.L.1968, c.277 (C.40:48-2.40 et seq.). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.